Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 3 Displaced Persons Committee

40-3-1.
Appointment of members.

The governor is hereby authorized and directed to appoint a committee of twelve (12) duly qualified electors of this state to be known as the Rhode Island displaced persons committee. The members of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2399, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-6-1

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-3-2.
Officers and subcommittees.

The displaced persons committee shall elect, from its members, a chairperson and a vice-chairperson and such other officers as it may determine, including an executive committee, and define their duties. The committee may appoint such subcommittees as it deems advisable and define their duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2399, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-6-2

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-3-3.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the displaced persons committee to expedite the processing of applications for admission to the United States of America and to the state, and to promote the rehabilitation and readjustment of displaced persons entering Rhode Island pursuant to federal law; to stimulate the interest of the community in the rehabilitation problems of displaced persons; to aid in interpreting and publicizing the problems relating to displaced persons; to cooperate with all governmental and private agencies serving displaced persons, to the end that duplication of effort may be avoided; to provide information and advice to displaced persons; and to perform other duties as the committee may, from time to time, determine, with the approval of the governor, to be appropriate and advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2399, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-6-3

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.